en: Bookmark design: Clip; Magnetic; Ribbon; Tassel; Other
sl-SI: Zasnova bralnega zaznamka: S sponko; Magnetno; Trak; Resice; Drugo
fi: Kirjanmerkin suunnittelu: Klipsi; Magneettinen; Nauha; Tupsu; Muu
pl: Projekt zakładki: Klips; Magnetyczny; Wstążka; Chwast; Inne
sk-SK: Dizajn záložiek: Spona; Magnetický; Stužka; Strapec; Iné
hu: Könyvjelző kialakítása: Kapcsos; Mágneses; Szalagos; Rojtos; Egyéb
ko: 북마크 디자인: 클립; 자기식; 리본; 태슬; 기타
fr: Conception de marque-pages: Prince; Magnétique; Ruban; Gland; Autre
es: Diseño de marcalibros: Clip; Magnético; Cinta; Borla; Otros
lt-LT: Skirtuko dizainas: Segtukas; Magnetinis; Juostelė; Kutai; Kita
bg-BG: Дизайн на отметки: Clip; Магнитен; Панделка; Пискюл; Други
vi: Thiết kế dấu trang: Kẹp; Từ tính; Ruy-băng; Núm tua; Khác
de: Design des Lesezeichens: Klemme; Magnetisch; Schleife; Quaste; Sonstiges
el: Σχεδίαση σελιδοδείκτη: Κλιπ; Μαγνητικό; Κορδέλα; Θύσανος; Άλλο
ja: しおりの種類: クリップ; 磁気; リボン; タッセル; その他
da: Bogmærkedesign: Clips; Magnetisk; Bånd; Kvast; Andet
hr-HR: Dizajn označivača stranica: Klip-kopča; Magnet; Vrpca; Kićanka; Ostalo
sv: Bokmärkesdesign: Klipp; Magnetisk; Band; Tofs; Övrigt
nb: Bokmerkedesign: Klipp; Magnetisk; Bånd; Dusk; Annet
it: Design del segnalibro: A clip; Magnetico; Nastro; Fiocco; Altro
zh-CN: 书签设计: 夹子; 磁力; 丝带; 流苏; 其他
nl: Ontwerp bladwijzer: Clip; Magnetisch; Lint; Kwast; Andere
tr: Kitap ayracı tasarımı: Klips; Manyetik; Kurdele; Püskül; Diğer
th: การออกแบบบุ๊กมาร์ก: คลิปหนีบ; แม่เหล็ก; ริบบิ้น; พู่; อื่นๆ
ru: Тип закладки: На клипсе; Магнит; Лента; Кисточки; Другое
pt-BR: Formato do marcador: Encaixar; Magnética; Fita; Borla; Outro
zh-TW: 書籤設計: 夾子; 磁性; 絲帶; 流蘇; 其他
ro-RO: Design semn de carte: Clemă; Magnetic; Panglică; Ciucure; Altele
pt-PT: Design de marcador: Grampo metálico; Magnético; Fita; Borla; Outro
cs: Design záložky: Klip; Magnetická; Páska; Střapec; Jiné